Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1728.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 41-1251, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1251. Joint committee on capital review; members; chairperson; meetings A. The joint committee on capital review is established consisting of fourteen members, including the chairpersons of the senate and house of representatives appropriations committees, the majority and minority leaders of the senate and the house of representatives, four members of the senate appropriations committee appointed by the president of the senate and four members of the house of representatives appropriations committee appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. The Senate minority leader may appoint a designee to serve in the senate minority leader's place. B. The chairperson of the senate appropriations committee has a term as chairperson of the joint committee on capital review from the first day of the first regular session to the first day of the second regular session of each legislature, and the chairperson of the house of representatives appropriations committee has a term from the first day of the second regular session to the first day of the next legislature's first regular session. C. The joint committee on capital review shall meet as often as the members deem necessary, and a majority of the members constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business. END_STATUTE